Connecticut, session 2026, HB05465.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) On and after October
2 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and
3 maintain a publicly accessible and searchable electronic portal on the
4 Internet web site of the Department of Motor Vehicles for the purpose
5 of providing information concerning (1) motor vehicles subjected to
6 nonconsensual towing or transporting, as defined in section 14-66 of the
7 general statutes, as amended by this act, and (2) motor vehicles taken
8 into custody and stored pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of section 14-
9 150 of the general statutes. The goal of the portal shall be to enable the
10 members of the public to determine whether a motor vehicle has been
11 towed or taken into custody and the location where such motor vehicle
12 is stored. The portal shall be available twenty-four hours per day and
13 shall not require the creation of a personal account for access to search
14 such information.
15 (b) When designing such portal, the commissioner shall consult with
16 the Towing Advisory Council, established under section 11 of this act,
17 to ensure the portal is easily operated and accessible when submitting,
18 and searching for, information on towed and stored motor vehicles. The
19 commissioner shall consider whether the portal may be used to permit
LCO 1 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
20 a wrecker service to electronically file forms prescribed by the
21 commissioner, including a notice of tow, and whether such electronic
22 filing may be used in lieu of mailing such forms.
23 (c) Each wrecker service or the owner or keeper of any garage, storage
24 facility or other place where a towed or transported motor vehicle is
25 stored shall, not later than forty-eight hours after such motor vehicle
26 arrives at the wrecker service's or owner's or keeper's business in a
27 secured lot, submit electronically to the portal information sufficient to
28 identify such motor vehicle, the identity and contact information for
29 such wrecker service or owner or keeper and any other information as
30 the commissioner may prescribe. If such motor vehicle was towed or
31 transported without the motor vehicle operator present, such wrecker
32 service or owner or keeper shall not charge storage fees for such motor
33 vehicle until the information regarding such tow is electronically
34 submitted to the portal in accordance with the provisions of this
35 subsection. Notwithstanding the provisions of subparagraph (A) of
36 subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 14-145 of the general statutes,
37 as amended by this act, a wrecker service who performs a private-
38 property trespass tow, as defined in section 14-66d of the general
39 statutes, as amended by this act, and electronically submits the
40 information regarding such tow to the portal in accordance with the
41 provisions of this section need not notify the local police department or
42 resident state trooper serving the municipality where the tow was
43 conducted of such tow.
44 (d) Each such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall update the
45 portal with information as prescribed by the commissioner to reflect
46 changes in the status of any such stored motor vehicle.
47 (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 14-51a and 14-64 of the
48 general statutes, the commissioner may not impose a civil penalty for a
49 wrecker service or owner or keeper who is unable to electronically
50 submit information to the portal in accordance with the provisions of
51 this section due to a technological issue or an electrical outage, provided
52 such wrecker service or owner or keeper documents such issue or
LCO 2 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
53 outage and electronically submits information to the portal as soon as
54 possible after such issue is resolved or electrical service is restored.
55 (f) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a wrecker service
56 or owner or keeper who stores a motor vehicle (1) that was towed with
57 the consent of the owner or operator, or (2) subject to repossession.
58 Sec. 2. Section 14-66e of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
59 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
60 October 1, 2026):
61 (a) For the purposes of this section:
62 (1) "Police-ordered towing" means towing or transporting and
63 recovery of a motor vehicle without the prior consent of authorization
64 of the owner or operator of the motor vehicle performed pursuant to the
65 provisions of section 14-150, as amended by this act, section 14-307 or
66 any other order of a police officer or traffic authority;
67 (2) "Oversize or overweight motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle,
68 combination of motor vehicle and trailer or commercial vehicle
69 combination, including each such motor vehicle's load, whose
70 dimensions or weight does not conform to the provisions of sections 14-
71 262, 14-262a, 14-264, 14-267a and 14-269 or any other requirement
72 specified in the general statutes;
73 (3) "Winching" means the process of moving a motor vehicle by the
74 use of chains, nylon slings or additional lengths of winch cable from a
75 position that is not accessible for direct hookup for towing a motor
76 vehicle;
77 (4) "Nonconsensual towing or transporting" and "recovery" have the
78 same meanings as provided in section 14-66, as amended by this act;
79 [and]
80 (5) "Light-duty motor vehicle", "medium-duty motor vehicle" and
81 "heavy-duty motor vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in
82 section 14-66d, as amended by this act; and
LCO 3 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
83 (6) "Electric vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section 16-
84 19eee.
85 (b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and publish
86 a schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered
87 towing that includes:
88 (1) A base hourly rate that may be charged for towing or transporting
89 services provided to (A) a light-duty motor vehicle, (B) a medium-duty
90 motor vehicle, (C) a heavy-duty motor vehicle, and (D) an oversize or
91 overweight motor vehicle. The commissioner shall identify the services
92 and equipment involved in the provision of such towing or transporting
93 services that are included in such base hourly rate;
94 (2) An hourly rate for winching services, provided such winching
95 service is performed on a vehicle that is located off a paved portion of a
96 highway;
97 (3) Hourly rates or charges for each type of specialized equipment
98 used in connection with the provision of police-ordered towing that are
99 not included in the base hourly rate established pursuant to subdivision
100 (1) of this subsection. Such rates or charges shall account for the cost of
101 each such type of specialized equipment and a reasonable profit margin;
102 (4) Hourly rates for labor that is not included in such base hourly rate;
103 [and]
104 (5) A charge for necessary administrative services; and
105 (6) On and after January 1, 2029, (A) a flat surcharge for towing and
106 transporting services provided to an electric vehicle, and (B) a flat rate
107 for towing or transporting a light-duty motor vehicle as a result of a
108 parking violation or due to other circumstances, provided the inclusion
109 of such rate was recommended by the Police-Ordered Towing Council
110 pursuant to subsection (e) of section 14-66f, as amended by this act.
111 (c) The schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to the
112 provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall be just and reasonable
LCO 4 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
113 and reflect the reasonable operating costs of wrecker services that
114 perform police-ordered towing. In establishing such rates and charges,
115 the commissioner shall consider factors, including, but not limited to,
116 the most recent transportation producer price index published by the
117 United States Department of Transportation, rates set by other
118 jurisdictions, rates for consensual towing of motor vehicles, the cost of
119 equipment required by regulations adopted pursuant to section 29-23a,
120 as amended by this act, and the cost of workers' compensation
121 insurance, unemployment compensation and insurance premiums.
122 (d) Not later than ninety days after receipt of a proposed schedule of
123 rates and charges and any supporting documentation from the Police-
124 Ordered Towing Council pursuant to section 14-66f, as amended by this
125 act, the commissioner shall (1) hold a public hearing for the purpose of
126 obtaining additional information concerning such proposed schedule,
127 and (2) establish and publish a schedule of rates and charges for the
128 provision of police-ordered towing. If the commissioner amends the
129 proposed schedule, the commissioner shall provide a written
130 explanation to the council of the reason for such amendment.
131 (e) (1) The commissioner shall adopt an addendum to the initial
132 schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to subsection (b) of
133 this section. Such addendum shall establish a flat surcharge for the
134 provision of police-ordered towing of an electric vehicle. In establishing
135 such surcharge, the commissioner shall consider the additional
136 operational risks and protocols associated with towing or transporting
137 an electric vehicle. Additionally, as part of such addendum, the
138 commissioner may consider establishing a flat rate for towing or
139 transporting a light-duty motor vehicle as a result of a parking violation
140 or due to other circumstances as may be recommended by the Police-
141 Ordered Towing Council pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection (e)
142 of section 14-66f, as amended by this act.
143 (2) Not later than ninety days after receipt of a proposed addendum
144 to such schedule of rates and charges and any supporting
145 documentation from the Police-Ordered Towing Council pursuant to
LCO 5 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
146 subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section 14-66f, as amended by this
147 act, the commissioner shall (A) hold a public hearing for the purpose of
148 obtaining additional information concerning such proposed addendum,
149 and (B) establish and publish an addendum to the schedule of rates and
150 charges. Such addendum shall be effective from the date of publication
151 by the commissioner until December 31, 2028. If the commissioner
152 amends the proposed addendum from the council, the commissioner
153 shall provide a written explanation to the council of the reason for such
154 amendment.
155 [(e)] (f) Upon the publication of a schedule or an addendum pursuant
156 to the provisions of this section, no wrecker service shall (1) charge more
157 than the rates and charges contained in such schedule or an addendum,
158 or (2) charge for services that are not included in such schedule or
159 addendum.
160 Sec. 3. Section 14-66f of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is
161 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
162 1, 2026):
163 (a) For the purposes of this section:
164 (1) "Police-ordered towing" and "oversize or overweight motor
165 vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in section 14-66e, as
166 amended by this act; [and]
167 (2) "Light-duty motor vehicle", "medium-duty motor vehicle" and
168 "heavy-duty motor vehicle" have the same meanings as provided in
169 section 14-66d, as amended by this act; and
170 (3) "Electric vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section 16-
171 19eee.
172 (b) There is established a Police-Ordered Towing Council within the
173 Department of Motor Vehicles for administrative purposes only. Such
174 council shall (1) advise the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles concerning
175 policies affecting police-ordered towing, and (2) develop a proposed
LCO 6 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
176 schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered towing
177 of light-duty, medium-duty, heavy-duty and oversize or overweight
178 motor vehicles.
179 (c) [The] On and after October 1, 2026, the council shall consist of the
180 following members: (1) Three representatives of an organization in the
181 state that represents towing and recovery professionals, appointed by
182 the Governor; (2) two representatives of an organization in the state that
183 represents the commercial trucking industry, appointed by the
184 Governor; (3) one representative of an association of police chiefs in the
185 state, appointed by the Governor; (4) one representative of an
186 association of fire chiefs in the state, appointed by the Governor; (5) one
187 representative of the insurance industry, appointed by the Governor;
188 [and] (6) one consumer advocate, appointed by the Governor; and (7)
189 the Commissioners of Transportation, Emergency Services and Public
190 Protection and Energy and Environmental Protection and the Insurance
191 Commissioner, or their designees.
192 (d) [Appointments] All initial appointments to the council shall be
193 made not later than August 1, 2025, and the initial appointment made
194 pursuant to subdivision (6) of subsection (c) of this section shall be made
195 not later than October 15, 2026. Each member appointed shall serve for
196 a term of three years and may serve until such member's successor is
197 appointed. Any vacancy shall be filled by the Governor not later than
198 thirty days after the date of such vacancy. The chairperson of the council
199 shall be appointed by the Governor and shall convene the first meeting
200 of the council not later than September 15, 2025.
201 (e) The council shall (1) on or before January 1, 2026, consider the
202 factors set forth in subsection (c) of section 14-66e, as amended by this
203 act, and submit to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles a proposed
204 schedule of rates and charges for the provision of police-ordered towing
205 of light-duty, medium-duty, heavy-duty and oversize or overweight
206 motor vehicles; (2) on or before January 1, 2027, consider the additional
207 operational risks and protocols associated with towing or transporting
208 an electric vehicle and submit to the commissioner a proposed
LCO 7 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
209 addendum to the schedule of rates and charges adopted pursuant to
210 section 14-66e, as amended by this act, for a flat surcharge for the
211 provision of police-ordered towing of electric vehicles. As part of such
212 addendum, the council shall consider establishing a flat rate for towing
213 or transporting a light-duty motor vehicle as a result of a parking
214 violation or due to any other circumstance as deemed reasonable by the
215 council and submit such recommended flat rate, if any, to the
216 commissioner; (3) in the period of time between June 1, 2028, and
217 September 1, 2028, inclusive, and every three years thereafter, review
218 and consider adjustments to the rates and charges published in
219 accordance with section 14-66e, as amended by this act, and submit such
220 recommended adjustments, if any, to the commissioner; [(3)] (4)
221 recommend specific procedures for determining whether a service
222 performed by a wrecker service in the provision of police-ordered
223 towing was required; [(4)] (5) request information from other parties to
224 assist with the work of the council and, in the discretion of the council,
225 hold public hearings for the purpose of obtaining information; and [(5)]
226 (6) make any additional recommendations to the Department of Motor
227 Vehicles that the council deems appropriate.
228 Sec. 4. Section 14-66d of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
229 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
230 October 1, 2026):
231 (a) For the purposes of this section:
232 (1) "Private-property trespass towing" means the towing or
233 transporting of a motor vehicle without the prior consent or
234 authorization of the owner or operator of the motor vehicle performed
235 in accordance with the provisions of section 14-145, as amended by this
236 act;
237 (2) "Light-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle with a gross
238 vehicle weight rating of less than ten thousand pounds;
239 (3) "Medium-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, including
240 any cargo, with a gross vehicle weight rating of ten thousand pounds or
LCO 8 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
241 more but not more than twenty-six thousand pounds;
242 (4) "Heavy-duty motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle, including any
243 cargo, with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than twenty-six
244 thousand pounds;
245 (5) "Drop fee" means the fee payable for the release of a motor vehicle
246 that has been connected to a wrecker but not yet removed from private
247 property from which such motor vehicle is to be towed;
248 (6) "After-hours redemption fee" means the fee payable for
249 redeeming a motor vehicle from a motor vehicle storage facility outside
250 the wrecker service's hours of operation; [and]
251 (7) "Nonconsensual towing or transporting" has the same meaning as
252 provided in section 14-66, as amended by this act; and
253 (8) "Electric vehicle" has the same meaning as provided in section 16-
254 19eee.
255 (b) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall establish and publish
256 a schedule of rates and charges for the provision of private-property
257 trespass towing and the storage of motor vehicles. Such schedule shall
258 be effective on January 1, 2026, and shall include (1) flat rates for towing
259 services provided to light-duty, medium-duty and heavy-duty motor
260 vehicles, (2) a fee for additional labor, (3) a drop fee, (4) a mileage fee,
261 (5) storage rates, and (6) an after-hours redemption fee. Not later than
262 November 1, 2025, the commissioner shall hold one public hearing for
263 the purpose of obtaining information to establish the schedule.
264 (c) Such flat rates shall include the first two miles of transportation
265 performed by such wrecker service. No wrecker service may charge a
266 mileage fee for more than thirteen additional miles of transportation
267 provided to a motor vehicle subject to private-property trespass towing.
268 (d) Such storage rates and the after-hours redemption fee shall apply
269 to the storage of light-duty, medium-duty and heavy-duty motor
270 vehicles subject to nonconsensual towing or transporting.
LCO 9 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
271 (e) The schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to the
272 provisions of this section shall be just and reasonable and reflect the
273 reasonable operating costs of wrecker services that perform private-
274 property trespass towing and store motor vehicles. In establishing such
275 rates and charges, the commissioner shall consider factors, including,
276 but not limited to, the most recent transportation producer price index
277 published by the United States Department of Transportation, rates set
278 by other jurisdictions and the cost of fuel, wreckers, motor vehicle parts,
279 equipment, personnel, workers' compensation insurance,
280 unemployment compensation and insurance premiums.
281 (f) In the period of time between July 1, 2028, and October 1, 2028,
282 inclusive, and every three years thereafter, the commissioner shall hold
283 one public hearing for the purpose of reconsidering the schedule of rates
284 and charges established pursuant to the provisions of subsection (b) of
285 this section. The commissioner may amend such established schedule if,
286 after consideration of the factors set forth in subsection (e) of this section
287 and the testimony received at the public hearing, the commissioner
288 determines that such established schedule is no longer just and
289 reasonable and does not reflect the reasonable operating costs of
290 wrecker services that perform private-property trespass towing. If the
291 commissioner amends such schedule, such amended schedule shall be
292 effective the January first following each public hearing held pursuant
293 to the provisions of this subsection. On and after January 1, 2029, any
294 amendment to such established schedule shall include a separate
295 storage rate for electric vehicles.
296 (g) The commissioner shall adopt an addendum to the initial
297 schedule of rates and charges established pursuant to subsection (b) of
298 this section and effective from January 1, 2026, to December 31, 2028,
299 inclusive. Such addendum shall establish a separate storage rate for
300 electric vehicles. In establishing such storage rate, the commissioner
301 shall consider the additional operational risks and protocols associated
302 with storing an electric vehicle and hold a public hearing for the purpose
303 of obtaining additional information concerning such storage rate. Such
304 addendum shall be effective from the date of publication by the
LCO 10 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
305 commissioner until December 31, 2028.
306 [(g)] (h) Upon the publication of a schedule or an addendum
307 pursuant to the provisions of this section, no wrecker service shall (1)
308 charge more than the rates and charges contained in such schedule or
309 addendum, or (2) charge for services that are not included in such
310 schedule or addendum.
311 [(h) The uniform rates and charges for the nonconsensual towing or
312 transporting and storage of motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
313 rating of less than ten thousand pounds established and published by
314 the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles pursuant to section 14-66 of the
315 general statutes, revision of 1958, revised to January 1, 2025, shall
316 continue to be effective on and after October 1, 2025, until December 31,
317 2025, inclusive, and no wrecker service shall charge more than such
318 published rates and charges during such period.]
319 Sec. 5. Subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of section 14-63 of the 2026
320 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
321 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
322 (2) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall receive, process and
323 investigate complaints from customers of dealers and repairers
324 concerning the operations of and services provided by any such dealer
325 or repairer, including the provision of nonconsensual towing or
326 transporting, recovery or storage of motor vehicles. The commissioner
327 may permit a dealer or repairer to stipulate to a complaint and waive
328 such dealer or repairer's right to an administrative hearing under the
329 provisions of chapter 54. No complaint regarding the provision of
330 police-ordered towing shall be brought but within one year from the
331 date of such police-ordered tow.
332 Sec. 6. Subsection (c) of section 14-66 of the 2026 supplement to the
333 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
334 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
335 (c) (1) Each wrecker used for towing or transporting motor vehicles
LCO 11 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
336 shall be registered as a wrecker by the commissioner for a fee of one
337 hundred twenty-five dollars. Each such registration shall be renewed
338 biennially according to renewal schedules established by the
339 commissioner so as to effect staggered renewal of all such registrations.
340 If the adoption of a staggered system results in the expiration of any
341 registration more or less than two years from its issuance, the
342 commissioner may charge a prorated amount for such registration fee.
343 (2) The commissioner shall provide not less than sixty days of written
344 or electronic notice to each wrecker service who registered a wrecker
345 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection prior to the
346 implementation of any (A) new internal policies or procedures or
347 modifications to existing internal policies or procedures concerning or
348 affecting wrecker services, or (B) new forms or modifications to existing
349 forms that are prescribed by the commissioner for use in the business of
350 operating a wrecker.
351 Sec. 7. Subsection (a) of section 29-23a of the 2026 supplement to the
352 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
353 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
354 (a) The Division of State Police within the Department of Emergency
355 Services and Public Protection shall establish, within its patrol
356 jurisdiction, a rotational system for summoning wrecker services, as
357 defined in section 14-1, for the purpose of towing or transporting motor
358 vehicles which are disabled, inoperative or wrecked in the event the
359 owners or operators of such vehicles are incapacitated, unavailable or
360 leave the procurement of wrecker service to the officer at the scene of an
361 accident or the location of a disabled vehicle. Any such wrecker service
362 may participate in such system, provided (1) such wrecker service
363 fulfills certain qualifications, including certification by the Towing and
364 Recovery Association of America or a certification program approved
365 by the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection, and
366 the wrecker service's equipment meets safety and mechanical standards
367 established by the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
368 Protection and the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, [and] (2) such
LCO 12 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
369 wrecker service and any employee of such wrecker service, not later
370 than one year from the date of hire, completes training provided by the
371 Department of Transportation concerning traffic incident management,
372 and (3) the wrecker service's business is located so as to provide prompt
373 and efficient service.
374 Sec. 8. Section 7-282g of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
375 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
376 October 1, 2026):
377 (a) If the owner or operator of a disabled vehicle is present at the
378 scene of an accident or at the location of the disabled vehicle and is able
379 to respond, the municipal police officer shall inquire whether such
380 owner or operator wishes to choose a wrecker service, as defined in
381 section 14-1, for the purposes of towing or transporting the disabled
382 vehicle. If such owner or operator wishes to do so and such chosen
383 wrecker service is on a rotational system maintained by the
384 municipality, if any, the police officer shall notify the chosen wrecker
385 service. If such chosen wrecker service cannot be contacted or is unable
386 or unwilling to respond in a timely manner as determined by the
387 municipal police officer, the municipal police officer shall (1) summon
388 the next available wrecker service on the rotational system if maintained
389 by the municipality, or (2) summon a wrecker service as chosen by such
390 municipal police officer.
391 (b) Any wrecker service that participates in a rotational system
392 maintained by a municipality and any employee of such wrecker
393 service, not later than one year from the date of hire, shall complete
394 training provided by the Department of Transportation concerning
395 traffic incident management.
396 Sec. 9. Section 14-150c of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
397 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
398 October 1, 2026):
399 (a) Whenever a motor vehicle is taken into custody and stored
400 pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of section 14-150, or is subject to
LCO 13 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
401 nonconsensual towing or transporting, as defined in section 14-66, as
402 amended by this act, the wrecker service or owner or keeper of any
403 garage, storage facility or other place where such motor vehicle is stored
404 shall have a lien upon such motor vehicle for towing or storage charges,
405 or both, imposed by such wrecker service or owner or keeper that result
406 from towing or storing a motor vehicle.
407 (b) [(1)] Except as provided in subsection (d) of section 14-150, if such
408 wrecker service or owner or keeper [makes a determination in good
409 faith that the current market value of the stored motor vehicle does not
410 exceed one thousand five hundred dollars and] determines such stored
411 motor vehicle has been stored for a period of not less than [fifteen] thirty
412 days, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall, unless an
413 application filed by the owner of such motor vehicle pursuant to
414 subsection (e) of section 14-150, as amended by this act, is pending and
415 the owner of such motor vehicle has notified such wrecker service or
416 owner or keeper that such application for hearing has been filed or
417 unless the owner of such motor vehicle opted out of receiving
418 subsequent notifications regarding the sale and disposition of such
419 motor vehicle in such form and manner as prescribed by the
420 Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, send a notice of intent to sell that
421 complies with subsection (c) of this section to the [Commissioner of
422 Motor Vehicles] commissioner, the owner of such motor vehicle and any
423 known lienholder of record of such motor vehicle at the end of such
424 [fifteen-day] thirty-day period. Upon approval by the commissioner of
425 the notice of intent to sell, the commissioner shall issue such wrecker
426 service or owner or keeper an affidavit of compliance. [Such wrecker
427 service or owner or keeper shall sell such motor vehicle not less than
428 five business days after the mailing date of the notice of intent and apply
429 the proceeds of the sale toward the towing and storage charges imposed
430 by such wrecker service or owner or keeper.
431 (2) If such wrecker service or owner or keeper makes a determination
432 in good faith that the current market value of the stored motor vehicle
433 exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars and if such motor vehicle
434 has been stored for a period of not less than forty-five days, such
LCO 14 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
435 wrecker service or owner or keeper shall, unless an application filed by
436 the owner pursuant to subsection (e) of section 14-150, is pending and
437 the owner of such motor vehicle has notified such wrecker service or
438 owner or keeper that such application for a hearing has been filed, send
439 a notice of intent to sell that complies with subsection (c) of this section
440 to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, the owner of such motor vehicle
441 and any known lienholder of record of such motor vehicle at the end of
442 such forty-five-day period. Upon approval by the commissioner of the
443 notice of intent to sell, the commissioner shall issue such wrecker service
444 or owner or keeper an affidavit of compliance.] Such wrecker service or
445 owner or keeper shall sell such motor vehicle at public auction for cash,
446 at the place of business of such wrecker service or owner or keeper. [not
447 less than five business days after the mailing date of the notice of intent
448 to sell.] Such owner or keeper shall apply the proceeds of such sale
449 toward the towing and storage charges imposed by such wrecker
450 service or owner or keeper, the expenses related to such sale and any
451 debt or obligation incurred by the officer who placed such motor vehicle
452 in storage in accordance with section 14-150, as amended by this act. At
453 any public auction held pursuant to this section, such wrecker service
454 or owner or keeper may set a minimum bid equal to the amount of such
455 wrecker service's or owner's or keeper's charges with respect to the tow
456 and storage of the motor vehicle. If no such bid is made, such wrecker
457 service or owner or keeper may sell or dispose of such vehicle.
458 [(3) In determining the current market value of the stored motor
459 vehicle pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (1) or (2) of this
460 subsection, the wrecker service may deduct for an observed defect or
461 missing major component part, as defined in section 14-149a.]
462 (c) (1) The notice of intent to sell described in subsection (b) of this
463 section shall include, but need not be limited to, (A) the make, model
464 and vehicle identification number of the stored motor vehicle, (B) the
465 date such motor vehicle was left with such wrecker service or owner or
466 keeper and by whom, (C) the registration number if any number plates
467 are on such motor vehicle, [(D) the retail market value of such motor
468 vehicle as determined by the wrecker service or owner or keeper, and
LCO 15 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
469 (E)] and (D) a statement to the owner and known lienholder that (i) the
470 stored motor vehicle will be sold at public auction for cash at the place
471 of business of such wrecker service or owner or keeper if not redeemed
472 in a timely manner, (ii) such motor vehicle may be redeemed until the
473 point-of-sale, (iii) any proceeds of such sale, after deducting the amount
474 due to such wrecker service or owner or keeper and any expenses of the
475 officer who placed such motor vehicle in storage, if applicable, will be
476 held in an escrow account and paid to the owner of such motor vehicle
477 or such owner's legal representatives, if claimed by such owner or legal
478 representatives not later than one year from the date of such sale, and
479 (iv) if such proceeds are not claimed within said period of time, such
480 proceeds will escheat to the state. Such wrecker service or owner or
481 keeper shall provide such notice and a copy of the consumer bill of
482 rights regarding towing, developed pursuant to section 14-66g, as
483 amended by this act, to the motor vehicle owner and lienholder both by
484 regular mail, postage prepaid, and by certified mail, return receipt
485 requested.
486 (2) Such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall also provide a copy
487 of the notice of intent to sell to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, in
488 a form and manner determined by the commissioner. Such notice of
489 intent to sell shall be accompanied by a filing fee of ten dollars and any
490 other information, such as photographs of the stored motor vehicle, that
491 the commissioner may prescribe. Such notice of intent to sell shall be
492 subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act, as defined
493 in section 1-200. The commissioner may send a copy of such notice of
494 intent to sell electronically to the owner or lienholder of such motor
495 vehicle.
496 (3) Any sale of a stored motor vehicle under the provisions of this
497 section shall be void, unless such wrecker service or owner or keeper
498 provides the notices required by this subsection.
499 (d) Upon receipt of a notice of intent to sell, the commissioner shall
500 review such notice and determine if the owner of the motor vehicle has
501 filed a customer complaint concerning such wrecker service or owner or
LCO 16 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
502 keeper pursuant to section 14-63, as amended by this act. The
503 commissioner shall not approve such proposed sale until any such
504 customer complaint is resolved. If the commissioner approves such
505 proposed sale, the commissioner shall issue such wrecker service or
506 owner or keeper an affidavit of compliance.
507 (e) (1) Upon receipt of an affidavit of compliance by the
508 commissioner, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall mail a
509 notice of proposed sale to the motor vehicle owner and known
510 lienholder both by regular mail, postage prepaid, and by certified mail,
511 return receipt requested, that indicates the date, time and place of the
512 proposed sale of such motor vehicle. Not less than five business days
513 after the mailing date of the notice of proposed sale, such wrecker
514 service or owner or keeper may proceed to sell such motor vehicle
515 pursuant to the provisions of [subdivision (1) or (2) of] subsection (b) of
516 this section.
517 (2) In addition to the thirty-day period immediately following the
518 date such motor vehicle was placed in storage under [subdivision (1) of]
519 subsection (b) of this section, [or a sixty-day period immediately
520 following the date such motor vehicle was placed in storage under
521 subdivision (2) of subsection (b) of this section,] the wrecker service may
522 only charge up to ten additional days of storage for such motor vehicle
523 after receipt of the affidavit of compliance issued by the commissioner.
524 (f) At the time of a sale conducted in accordance with the provisions
525 of this section, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall provide
526 the purchaser of such motor vehicle with the affidavit of compliance
527 issued by the commissioner.
528 (g) Not later than fifteen days after the sale of a motor vehicle in
529 accordance with the provisions of this section, such wrecker service or
530 owner or keeper of such garage shall (1) report the sale price, towing
531 and storage charges, repair charges, if any, expenses related to the sale,
532 any proceeds, the buyer's name and address, identification of the vehicle
533 and such other information as may be required in regulations adopted
LCO 17 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
534 pursuant to section 14-150d, to the commissioner, (2) deposit the
535 proceeds of such sale, after deducting the amount due to such wrecker
536 service or owner or keeper and any expenses of the officer who placed
537 such motor vehicle in storage, if applicable, into an escrow account, and
538 (3) upon receipt of a claim by the prior owner of such motor vehicle or
539 such owner's legal representatives not later than one year from the date
540 of such sale, pay such sale proceeds to the prior owner or such owner's
541 legal representatives. If such sale proceeds are not claimed within said
542 period of time, such sale proceeds shall escheat to the state as unclaimed
543 property and the wrecker service or owner or keeper shall be subject to
544 the requirements of part III of chapter 32, including all obligations of a
545 holder of unclaimed property. Not later than ten days after filing any
546 report and paying any funds to the Treasurer as required by part III of
547 chapter 32, such wrecker service or owner or keeper shall provide
548 evidence to the commissioner, in a form and manner determined by the
549 commissioner, that such report was submitted and funds have
550 escheated.
551 [(h) In no event shall such wrecker service or owner or keeper sell a
552 motor vehicle that has not been (1) stored for at least thirty days if the
553 current market value of such motor vehicle does not exceed one
554 thousand five hundred dollars, or (2) stored for at least sixty days if the
555 current market value of such motor vehicle exceeds one thousand five
556 hundred dollars.]
557 Sec. 10. Subsection (f) of section 14-145 of the 2026 supplement to the
558 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
559 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
560 (f) (1) (A) Not later than two hours after an unauthorized motor
561 vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker service, or a
562 repossessed motor vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker
563 service or an exempt entity, as described in subsection (g) of section 14-
564 66, the wrecker service or the exempt entity shall notify the local police
565 department or resident state trooper serving the municipality where the
566 tow or removal was conducted and specify the time the motor vehicle
LCO 18 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
567 was towed or removed, the location from which the vehicle was
568 removed and the location at which the vehicle is stored. Such
569 notification shall be submitted, in writing, or transmitted by facsimile or
570 electronic mail and the record of such notification shall be retained by
571 such wrecker service or exempt entity in accordance with the provisions
572 of section 14-66b. No such wrecker service or exempt entity may charge
573 a storage fee for an unauthorized or repossessed motor vehicle for the
574 time it is stored prior to notification of the local police department or
575 resident state trooper by the wrecker service or exempt entity.
576 (B) If such motor vehicle remains unclaimed forty-eight hours after
577 the notification pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this subdivision, the
578 wrecker service or owner of the garage where such motor vehicle is
579 stored or the exempt entity shall immediately complete a notice of
580 [such] tow, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor
581 Vehicles, and mail a copy of such form by regular mail, postage prepaid,
582 and by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the owner and all
583 lienholders of record. If the motor vehicle is not claimed by its owner
584 within [the time periods specified in subsection (b) of section 14-150c]
585 thirty days, the wrecker service or owner of the garage where such
586 motor vehicle is stored or the exempt entity may dispose of such motor
587 vehicle in accordance with the provisions of section 14-150c, as amended
588 by this act.
589 (2) The local police department or resident state trooper, not later
590 than forty-eight hours after receiving notification of a tow or removal of
591 an unauthorized motor vehicle pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
592 subsection, shall enter the vehicle identification number into the
593 National Crime Information Center database and the Connecticut On-
594 Line Law Enforcement Communications Teleprocessing System to
595 determine whether such motor vehicle has been reported as stolen. If
596 such motor vehicle has been reported as stolen, the local police
597 department or resident state trooper shall immediately notify the
598 department that reported the vehicle as stolen.
599 Sec. 11. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established a Towing
LCO 19 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
600 Advisory Council to advise the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles
601 concerning laws, regulations and best practices relating to the
602 provisions of nonconsensual towing or transporting and the storage,
603 redemption and sale of towed motor vehicles. The council shall evaluate
604 ways to (1) ensure motor vehicle owners receive notices when their
605 motor vehicles are subjected to nonconsensual tow, (2) enhance the
606 ability of such owners to redeem their towed motor vehicles, and (3)
607 modernize and improve the process of selling motor vehicles at public
608 auction, including the feasibility of conducting such auctions online or
609 by third parties, and recommend amendments to the general statutes or
610 the regulations adopted pursuant to section 14-65 of the general statutes
611 to effectuate such modernization and improvements.
612 (b) The council shall consist of the following members, appointed by
613 the commissioner: (1) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, or the
614 commissioner's designee; (2) two employees of the Department of
615 Motor Vehicles; (3) three representatives of an organization in the state
616 that represents towing and recovery professionals; and (4) two
617 consumer advocates. The commissioner, or the commissioner's
618 designee, shall serve as chairperson of the council and shall schedule the
619 first meeting of the council not later than September 1, 2026. The council
620 may consult with any other agencies, officials or interested parties that
621 the council deems appropriate to complete the work of the council.
622 (c) Appointments to the council shall be made not later than August
623 1, 2026. Each member appointed shall serve for a term of three years and
624 may serve until such member's successor is appointed. Any vacancy
625 shall be filled by the commissioner not later than thirty days after the
626 date of such vacancy.
627 Sec. 12. Subsection (c) of section 14-66g of the 2026 supplement to the
628 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
629 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
630 (c) On and after October 1, [2025] 2026, a wrecker service shall (1) post
631 the consumer bill of rights at the wrecker service's place of business,
LCO 20 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
632 [and] (2) make copies of such bill of rights available for distribution to
633 customers who visit such place of business, and (3) include with each
634 notice of tow mailed to the motor vehicle owner and lienholders of
635 record (A) such bill of rights, and (B) an itemized towing bill that states
636 the charges owed for towing and transporting and the daily storage rate
637 and includes a statement that charges for storage will accumulate at
638 such daily storage rate until the motor vehicle is redeemed. If a wrecker
639 service maintains an Internet web site for its business, the wrecker
640 service shall prominently post such bill of rights on such Internet web
641 site.
642 Sec. 13. Subsection (e) of section 14-150 of the 2026 supplement to the
643 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
644 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
645 (e) Within forty-eight hours of the time that a motor vehicle is taken
646 into custody and stored pursuant to subsection (b) or (c) of this section,
647 the affixing department or parking authority shall give written notice
648 both by regular mail, postage prepaid, and by certified mail, return
649 receipt requested, to the owner and any lienholders of such motor
650 vehicle, if such motor vehicle appears on the records of the Department
651 of Motor Vehicles. The wrecker service that took such motor vehicle into
652 custody shall make a reasonable effort to identify the owner or
653 lienholders of such motor vehicle and send written notice both by
654 regular mail, postage prepaid, and by certified mail, return receipt
655 requested, to the owner and any lienholders of such motor vehicle. The
656 notice of tow provided by the affixing department, parking authority
657 and wrecker service shall state: (1) That the motor vehicle has been taken
658 into custody and stored, (2) the location of storage of the motor vehicle,
659 (3) that, unless title has already vested in the municipality pursuant to
660 subsection (d) of this section, such motor vehicle may be sold in
661 accordance with section 14-150c, as amended by this act, [and] (4) that
662 the owner has a right to contest the validity of such taking by submitting
663 an application, on a form prescribed by the Commissioner of Motor
664 Vehicles, to the hearing officer named in such notice within ten days
665 from the date of such notice, and (5) that the owner may submit a
LCO 21 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
666 request to opt out of receiving subsequent notifications regarding the
667 sale and disposition of such motor vehicle in such form and manner as
668 prescribed by the commissioner. Such application forms shall be made
669 readily available to the public at all offices and on the Internet web site
670 of the Department of Motor Vehicles, parking authorities authorized
671 under an ordinance adopted pursuant to section 7-204a to enforce
672 parking regulations and state and local police departments.
673 Sec. 14. Subparagraph (A) of subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of
674 section 14-145 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes is repealed
675 and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
676 (f) (1) (A) Not later than two hours after an unauthorized motor
677 vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker service, or a
678 repossessed motor vehicle is towed or otherwise removed by a wrecker
679 service or an exempt entity, as described in subsection (g) of section 14-
680 66, the wrecker service or the exempt entity shall notify the local police
681 department or resident state trooper serving the municipality where the
682 tow or removal was conducted and specify the time the motor vehicle
683 was towed or removed, the location from which the vehicle was
684 removed and the location at which the vehicle is stored, unless such
685 wrecker service electronically submits information regarding such tow
686 or removal to the portal in accordance with section 1 of this act. Such
687 notification shall be submitted, in writing, or transmitted by facsimile or
688 electronic mail and the record of such notification shall be retained by
689 such wrecker service or exempt entity in accordance with the provisions
690 of section 14-66b. No such wrecker service or exempt entity may charge
691 a storage fee for an unauthorized or repossessed motor vehicle for the
692 time it is stored prior to notification of the local police department or
693 resident state trooper by the wrecker service or exempt entity.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 14-66e
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 14-66f
LCO 22 of 23

Substitute Bill No. 5465
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 14-66d
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 14-63(b)(2)
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 14-66(c)
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 29-23a(a)
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 7-282g
Sec. 9 October 1, 2026 14-150c
Sec. 10 October 1, 2026 14-145(f)
Sec. 11 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 12 October 1, 2026 14-66g(c)
Sec. 13 October 1, 2026 14-150(e)
Sec. 14 October 1, 2026 14-145(f)(1)(A)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Section 6 was redrafted to amend section 14-66(c) of the general statutes
instead of section 14-63 of the general statutes for statutory consistency,
and in Section 11(b), "such study" was changed to "the work of the
council" for consistency with other provisions of the section.
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 23 of 23